California, session 20252026, SB976.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1970 of the Streets and Highways Code is amended to read:1970. (a) Local authorities, with respect to highways under their respective jurisdictions, may place and maintain, or cause to be placed and maintained, courtesy signs to recognize the sponsors of the Adopt-A-Riverway Program.(b) Courtesy signs shall be consistent with existing code provisions and department rules and regulations concerning signs.(c) Courtesy signs shall only be placed upon the highways of a local authority, upon the approval of an authorizing resolution by a majority of the members of the governing body of that local authority. The resolution authorizing the placement of courtesy signs shall include all of the following:(1) A general plan of where the courtesy signs will be placed within the geographical borders of the local authority, including any street, bike trail, or pedestrian path.(2) A finding that the planned placement of the courtesy signs would not degrade the natural environment of the area.(d) Courtesy signs shall contain the title “Adopt-A-Riverway” at the top of the sign and the name or logo of the sponsoring person or entity below the “Adopt-A-Riverway” title. Logos shall be provided at the sponsors’ own cost. Both the title and the logo shall be in large enough fonts that are fonts large enough to be easily read.